District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
41 act may be cited as the “Guiding Renewable Interconnection and Distribution (GRID) Amendment
42 Act of 2026”.
1

43 Sec. 2. The Clean and Affordable Energy Amendment Act of 2008, effective October 22,
44 2008, (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code § 8–1773.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
45 (a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 8–1773.01) is amended as follows:
46 (1) Paragraph (1) is redesignated as paragraph (1A)
47 (2) A new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:
48 “(1) “Interconnection Customer” means any individual, entity, or their
49 representative who applies to connect a solar system to a District electric grid managed by an
50 electric company.”.
51 (3) Paragraph (2) is redesignated as paragraph (2A)
52 (4) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
53 “(2) “Grid” means the electric distribution system that provides power and allows
54 small generators including commercial and community solar customers in the District to
55 interconnect.”.
56 (5) Paragraph (3) is redesignated as paragraph (3A)
57 (6) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
58 “(3) “Small Generator Facility” means the equipment used by a customer to
59 generate or store electricity that operates in tandem with the grid, and usually includes an electric
60 generator, storage capability, and interconnection equipment.”.
61 (7) Paragraph (4) is redesignated as paragraph (4A)
62 (8) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
63 “(4) “Interconnection Request” means the initial submission by an applicant or their
64 representative to an Electric Company that begins review of whether a solar system may be
65 connected safely and reliably to the grid.”.
2

66 (9) Paragraph (5) is redesignated as paragraph (5A)
67 (10) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
68 “(5) “Net energy metering” means measuring the difference between the electricity
69 supplied to an eligible customer-generator from the electric grid and the electricity generated and
70 fed back to the electric grid by the eligible customer-generator.”.
71 (11) Paragraph (6) is redesignated as paragraph (6A)
72 (12) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
73 “(6) “Solar system” means a system using radiant energy, direct, diffuse, or
74 reflected, received from the sun at wavelengths suitable for conversion into thermal, chemical, or
75 electrical energy, that is collected, generated, or stored for use at a later time.”
76 (13) Paragraph (7) is redesignated as paragraph (7A)
77 (14) A new paragraph (7) is added to read as follows:
78 “(7) “Primary voltage customer” means customers receiving power from a higher
79 voltage level of 4kV, 13kV, 27kV, and 33kV.”.
80 (15) Paragraph (8) is redesignated as paragraph (8A)
81 (16) A new paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
82 “(8) “Secondary voltage customer” means a customers receiving power directly
83 from the grid distribution system at lower voltage levels of 120/208V; 120/240V or 265/460V.”
84 (17) Paragraph (9) is redesignated as paragraph (9A)
85 (18) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
86 “(9) “Electric company” means an electric utility entity that
87 distributes electricity to customers and is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service
88 Commission.”.
3

89 (b) A new section 206a to read as follows:
90 “Sec 206a. Solar interconnection standards; solar permitting and cost transparency for
91 small solar projects and electricity ratepayers.
92 “(a) As part of their initial application for authorization to install their solar system, any
93 Interconnection Customer that seeks to connect a distributed energy resource to the grid shall
94 submit an Interconnection Request to the Electric Company.
95 “(b)(1) Upon receipt of the initial Interconnection Request from an Interconnection
96 Customer or their representative, any Electric Company shall conduct an internal review prior to
97 formal authorization to proceed to installing solar onsite to determine:
98 “(A) The technical feasibility of the proposed solar project;
99 “(B) Whether any upgrades to the grid are required to facilitate the specific
100 interconnection for which an Interconnection Request has been submitted; and
101 “(C) An estimated cost for interconnection, based on the median costs
102 published on the Electric Company’s website in accordance with the requirements of
103 section (d)(2) below.
104 “(2)(A) For all projects going through initial interconnection review, the Electric
105 Company shall comply with all requirements of 15 DCMR § 4007 et seq.
106 “(B) The Electric Company shall meet the following deadlines and
107 requirements outlined in this section.
108 “(C) Where any conflicts arise between existing solar interconnection
109 requirements under 15 DCMR § 4007 et seq, this section shall control.”
110 (3)(A) Following its internal review, the Electric Company shall notify a Customer
4

111 of its initial decision on Part 1 of the initial interconnection request in writing or by electronic mail
112 pursuant, within the timeline provided by 15 DCMR § 4004.3.
113 “(B) When completing the internal review for any Customer’s initial
114 Interconnection Request, if the Electric Company determined that the Interconnection Request is
115 incomplete or transferred to a different project level, the Electric Company shall notify the
116 Customer of its determination and provide the Interconnection Customer with an opportunity to
117 resubmit their application.
118 “(3)(A) For assessing any modifications to the proposed interconnection
119 equipment after the initial review, the Electric Company shall provide notice to the
120 Interconnection Customer of its updated cost estimate and construction schedule no later
121 than fifteen days after notice of the initial interconnection review results.
122 “(B) If additional analysis of system upgrades is needed, the Electric
123 Company shall notify the Interconnection Customer that a wider study of the interconnection
124 infrastructure and potential impacts to the grid will need to be completed within twenty-five days.
125 “(C) The Electric Company shall provide a Interconnection Customer with
126 a facilities study no later than twenty-five from providing notice to the Interconnection Customer
127 as described in paragraph (3)(A) of this subsection .
128
129 “(5)(A) An Electric Company shall issue a report to the Commission at least
130 annually assessing whether interconnection review timelines comply with the requirements of 15
131 DCMR § 4000 et seq., and adhere to all corrective action plans and reporting requirements.
5

132 “(B) The report shall include compliance with 15 DCMR § 4004.7 requiring
133 that the company issue at least ninety percent of final permits within twenty days of receiving a
134 completed application.
135 “(6) For any project that the EDC determines it approves with conditions such as
136 construction or installation of interconnection facilities or distribution system upgrades, or
137 operating requirements, the Electric Distribution Company shall send an executed interconnection
138 agreement to the customer or their representative that includes:
139 “(A) Any operating requirements; and
140 “(B) A cost estimate for interconnection, based on the most recent
141 guidance published as described in paragraph (3).
142 “(7) For any project that was denied approval, an Electric Distribution Company
143 shall provide a reason for the denial indicating which screens the proposed project failed, including
144 the days and times per year that the EDC screening tools showed the proposed system failed the
145 screen.
146 “(8) An Electric Company shall comply with 15 DCMR § 4009 et seq. governing
147 complaint procedures on resolving disputes promptly, equitably, and in a good faith manner. The
148 company shall also ensure that:
149 “(A) Estimated costs during dispute resolution do not exceed the most
150 recent public guidance by the company.
151 “(B) A legal representative for the company must be present and able to
152 participate in final dispute resolution.
153 “(C) The Electric Company shall not assess Interconnection Customers
154 for costs that are more than 15 percent above the initial cost estimate provided pursuant to 15
6

155 DCMR § 4005.6. The Electric Company shall be responsible for costs invoiced to the
156 interconnection customer more than 60 days after the completion of the interconnection facility or
157 distribution upgrades.
158
159 “(c)(1) The Commission, in consultation with the Department of Energy and Environment and the
160 Office of the People’s Counsel, shall regularly update and ensure that the Electric Company
161 adheres to all existing requirements of the District of Columbia Small Generator Interconnection
162 Rules established pursuant to D.C. Official Code §§ 2-505 and 34-802.
163 “(d)(1) The Commission, in consultation with the Department of Energy and Environment
164 and the Office of the People’s Counsel, shall establish an interconnection ombuds office. The
165 ombuds will possess technical expertise related to interconnection and interconnection procedures.
166 The duties of the interconnection ombuds include but are not limited to the requirements of
167 paragraph:
168 “(A) Tracking interconnection complaints and disputes;
169 “(B) Facilitating the efficient and fair resolution of disputes between
170 customers seeking to interconnect and investor-owned transmission and distribution utilities;
171 “(C) Reviewing investor-owned transmission and distribution utility
172 interconnection policies to assess opportunities for reducing interconnection disputes and reducing
173 interconnection costs;
174 “(D) Preparing reports that detail the number, type, resolution timeline and
175 outcome of interconnection complaints and disputes.
176 “(2) Any Electric Company shall:
7

177 “(A) Publish and maintain a time-stamped guide to interconnection for
178 small generators interconnection on its website that describes the process for interconnection and
179 provides median costs for equipment, labor, and other expenses that are included in its cost
180 estimates for interconnection facilities and distribution system upgrades, based on average costs
181 for the last two years;
182 “(B) Bill interconnection customers only for necessary modifications to the
183 distribution system, and provide an itemized list of major costs, broken down by, at a minimum,
184 itemized equipment and labor, overhead, taxes, and contingency to the customer.
185 “(C) Comply with any changes to the Chapter 40 Public Service
186 Commission “Approval to Install” definition that include approval of high-level schematics, public
187 equipment specifications, and naming the feeder that the Electric Company approves
188 interconnection, when relevant.
189 “(D) Issue “Authorization to Interconnect” responses within fifteen
190 business days of notification of screening results.
191 “(E) Transmit invoices for cost estimates within 10 business days after
192 receipt of notification by the interconnection customer that it accepts the cost estimate;
193 “(F) Finalize construction and installation of necessary Interconnection
194 Facilities, Distribution System Upgrades, or other equipment the Electric Company needs to
195 provide or install no later than three (3) months after a temporary-pending-final or final inspection
196 certificate from a District electric code official is submitted to the company by the interconnection
197 customer. If the Electric Company cannot meet the deadline, it shall notify the Commission, which
198 may approve an extension not to exceed three months, unless additional actions and a reasonable
199 interconnection timeline are provided.
8

200 “(G) Issue Authorization to Operate for all systems within twenty (20)
201 business days of receiving a completed Part II - Small Generator Facility Interconnection
202 Certificate of Completion Form, including the signed inspection certificate.
203 “(3) On or before February 1 of each year, the Electric Company shall submit to
204 the Commission a report on each recorded voted cast by the Electric Company or an affiliate of
205 the Electric Company at a meeting of the regional transmission organization during the
206 immediately preceding calendar year. The report shall include all recorded votes cast by the
207 Electric Company.
208 “(4)(A) Within one year of the effective date of this act, the Electric Company shall
209 submit a service tariff to the Public Service Commission for approval for a cost sharing and
210 allocation methodology for solar interconnection customers in accordance with the requirements
211 of this paragraph.
212 “(B) Under the cost sharing and allocation methodology, an electric utility
213 may propose a grid capacity upgrade project to the interconnection customer or customers.
214 “(C) The utility shall charge primary, high voltage interconnection
215 customers a hosting capacity fee for its share of the hosting capacity upgrade cost proportional to
216 the interconnection customer's utilization of hosting capacity.
217 “(i) An Electric Company may petition the Commission to
218 implement a grid capacity cost sharing and allocation methodology for solar interconnection
219 customers that is not locationally based in their tariff filing.
220 “(ii) An Interconnection Request shall be eligible for hosting
221 capacity cost sharing and allocation under this section unless they are exempted for the following
222 reasons:
9

223 “(I) The Interconnection Request is subject to the
224 PJM Interconnection, LLC Tariff.
225 “(II) The interconnection is on a dedicated primary
226 voltage feeder that may not benefit any other interconnection customer
227 “(III) If more than one Interconnection Request
228 exists in the interconnection queue that will benefit from the electric utility proposed hosting
229 capacity upgrade project, these interconnection customers shall be clustered together for the
230 purpose of calculating hosting capacity fees.”
231 “(ii) Hosting capacity fees for clustered interconnection customers
232 shall be calculated proportional to each interconnection customer's utilization of the hosting
233 capacity created by the hosting capacity upgrade project.
234 “(iv) All hosting capacity upgrade costs in excess of hosting
235 capacity fees collected shall be accumulated in a separate unallocated cost account for future
236 expenditures on to primary voltage interconnection.
237 “(v) Unallocated hosting capacity upgrade costs for primary
238 voltage Interconnection Customers shall be shared and allocated to other primary voltage
239 customers using a primary voltage hosting capacity cost sharing and allocation methodology in an
240 electric utility service tariff approved by the Commission.
241 “(F) The utility shall charge secondary, lower voltage interconnection
242 residential and commercial customer a hosting capacity fee for its share of the hosting capacity
243 upgrade cost proportional to the Interconnection Customer's utilization of hosting capacity.
10

244 (i) If sufficient hosting capacity is not available at a point of
245 interconnection for a secondary voltage Interconnection Customer, an electric utility may construct
246 a hosting capacity upgrade project for the Interconnection Customer or Customers.
247 (ii) All secondary voltage hosting capacity upgrade costs shall be
248 accumulated in separate unallocated accounts for both residential and commercial secondary
249 voltage Interconnection Customers for future allocation in hosting capacity fees.
250 (iii) Unallocated hosting capacity upgrade costs for both residential
251 and commercial secondary voltage Interconnection Customers shall be shared and allocated to
252 other secondary voltage Interconnection Customers using a hosting capacity cost sharing and
253 allocation fee in an electric utility service tariff approved by the Commission.
254 “(G) Hosting capacity fees for primary voltage Interconnection Customers
255 shall be reset using a cost sharing and allocation methodology approved by the Commission in an
256 electric utility service tariff filing whenever a change in methodology is proposed, unless the fee
257 is zero or the fee change is less than $1 per kilowatt.
258 “(H) Hosting capacity fees for secondary voltage Interconnection
259 Customers shall be reset annually using a cost sharing and allocation methodology approved by
260 the Commission unless the fee is zero or the fee change is less than $1 per kilowatt from the current
261 fee in the electric utility's service tariff.
262 “(I) A utility may submit for Commission approval an administrative charge
263 in its service tariff to recover its administrative costs for managing the cost sharing and allocation
264 methodology for primary and secondary voltage Interconnection Customers.
11

265 “(J) A utility shall describe all hosting capacity upgrade project rightsizing
266 projects describing their forecasts, inputs, and assumptions in their next rate case to assist relevant
267 groups in a prudency review.
268 “(K) The cost-sharing framework and relevant interconnection
269 requirements shall be regularly updated and approved by the Public Service Commission, in
270 consultation with the Department of Energy and Environment and the Office of the People’s
271 Counsel.
272 “(e)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a portable solar generation device shall
273 not be subject to interconnection or net metering requirements unless the owner of a portable solar
274 generation device chooses to voluntarily enter into an interconnection or net metering
275 agreement”.”
276 “(2) The Electric Company may not require a customer using a portable solar generation
277 device to:
278 “(I) Obtain approval before installing or using the system;
279 “(II) Pay any fee or charge related to the system; or
280 “(III) Install any additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated into
281 the system.
282 “(3) The Electric Company is not liable for any damage or injury caused by a portable solar
283 generation device.
284 “(4)(A) In order to ensure safe operation and reduce impacts on the grid, portable solar
285 generation devices must:
286 “(B) Meet the most recent version of the National Electrical Code and be certified
287 by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory;
288 “(C) Include a device or feature that prevents the system from energizing the
289 building's electrical system during a power outage”.”
12

290 Sec. 3 The Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard Act of 2004, effective April 12, 2005
291 (D.C. Law 15-340; D.C. Official Code § 34-1431 et seq.), is amended as follows.
292 (a) Section 3(15)(H) (D.C. Official Code § 34-1431(15)(H)) is amended by striking the
293 phrase “Raw or treated wastewater” and inserting the phrase “Raw wastewater, treated wastewater,
294 or air” in its place.
295 (b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 34-1432) is amended as follows
296 (1) Subsection (e) is amended by adding new paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) to read as
297 follows:
298 “(4) Six months after the effective date of the Guiding Renewable Interconnection
299 and Distribution (GRID) Amendment Act of 2025, a system or facility using geothermal energy
300 located outside of the District of Columbia shall not be eligible to generate renewable energy
301 credits.
302 “(5) New certifications for Tier 1 renewable energy systems utilizing air as energy
303 sources as defined in Section 15(3)(H) of this act must:
304 “(A) Be put into first operation after October 1, 2025;
305 “(B) Be located in the District of Columbia; and
306 “(C) Replace existing equipment that provides thermal energy to buildings
307 via on-site combustion of fuels.
308 “(6)(A) A renewable energy system using energy sources defined in section
309 3(15)(H) whose output capacity is smaller than 134,000 British thermal energy units per hour shall
310 be assigned all renewable energy credits at the time of registration of the system upfront.
311 “(B) A lifetime total of nine renewable energy credits shall be assigned for
312 every 1,000 British thermal units of rated thermal energy capacity of such a system.
13

313 “(C) No further renewable energy credits shall accrue for such a system
314 after the upfront assignment of lifetime credits”.”
315 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
316 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
317 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
318 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
319 Sec. 6. Effective date.
320 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
321 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
322 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
323 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
324 Columbia Register.
325
326
14